Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 128
DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Section

PART 1 BOARD OF DIRECTORS

PART 2 MEETINGS AND ACTION
OF THE BOARD

PART 3 OFFICERS

PART 4 STANDARDS OF CONDUCT

PART 5 DIRECTORS' CONFLICTING
INTEREST TRANSACTIONS